test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-uuomwg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ūomõg: # Noun 157 'eng /est andam/fin' - full paradigm
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Nom: ūomõg
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Gen: ūomõg
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Par: ūomõgt
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Dat: ūomõgõn
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Ins: ūomõgõks
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Ill: ūomõgõ
     ūomõg+N+Sg+Ela: ūomõgst
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Nom: ūomõgõd
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Gen: ūomõgõd
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Par: ūomõgidi
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Dat: ūomõgõdõn
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Ins: ūomõgõdõks
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Ill: ūomõgiž
     ūomõg+N+Pl+Ela: ūomõgist
